Massachusetts, session 194th, S1098.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 184 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting the following new section:-
Section 36. Warrantless Searches
Section 36. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly states otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Government agent” any local, state, or federal official who is employed or contracted by
government in this state, including any peace officer, inspector, and wildlife official.
“Home” any private residence that is owned, leased, used or occupied, including the
curtilage surrounding the residence.
“Private land” land that is owned, leased, used, or occupied by a natural person or a non-
government entity, including all such lands that would otherwise be considered “open fields.”
of 3

“Probable cause” the presence of facts and circumstances within the government agent’s
knowledge that would warrant a person of reasonable caution to believe that an offense has been
or is being committed. The possession, discharge, or use, by itself, of one or more items that are
legal to possess does not constitute probable cause for a government agent to enter a home or
private land.
“Warrant” a court order that is supported by individualized probable cause and executed
by a magistrate or judge.
(b) No government agent shall enter a home or private land without a warrant except:
(i) After receiving the permission of the property owner, lessee, or occupant;
(ii) To respond to a life-threatening emergency or another immediate threat to public
safety that was either reported to the agent or the agent personally observed
(iii) To prevent the imminent unlawful killing of wildlife or the destruction of evidence of
such unlawful killing where the agent has probable cause to believe either is about to occur; or
(iv) To dispatch crippled or distressed wildlife the agent has personally observed.
Upon entering private land, the government agent shall immediately notify the
landowner, lessee, or occupant if notice can be reasonably made. Unless entering under an
exception in this subsection, a government agent shall show the warrant to the property owner,
lessee, or occupant if they are present. If a government agent is equipped with a body-mounted
camera while entering a home or private land, the camera must be activated and recording the
entire time the agent is on the property. If a government agent enters private land pursuant to
clause (iv) of this subsection, the agent shall produce, upon the request of the landowner, lessee,
of 3

or lawful occupant, an image or other photo or video evidence of the wildlife dispatched by the
agent. A government agent shall not seize any private property, including currency, vehicles,
weapons, tools, or wild game, from a home or private land unless: (i) the agent first acquires a
warrant authorizing the seizure, or (ii) the agent has entered the home or private land with
consent or under exigent circumstances and has individualized probable cause of the commission
of a criminal offense.
(c) Any evidence obtained pursuant to a search or seizure conducted in violation of this
section is inadmissible in any administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding. Any arrest made
pursuant to a search or seizure conducted in violation of this section is invalid. If a government
agent searches or enters a home or private land in violation of this section, a person who believes
their rights have been violated may pursue an action under sections 11H through 11J, inclusive,
of chapter 12 of the General Laws. In an action under subsection (b), a prevailing plaintiff may
recover declaratory relief, injunctive relief, compensatory damages, nominal damages, and
attorney’s fees.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3